Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.150

Individual assessments on district property—Liens.

All assessments imposed on the respective lots, tracts, parcels of land, and other property included within the boundaries of an approved district in accordance with this chapter are a lien upon the property from the date of final approval and are paramount and superior to any other lien or encumbrance whatsoever, theretofore or thereafter created, except a lien for general taxes.

[ 2010 c 7 s 601.]